Louisiana, session 2026, HB1224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Article 610(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted and
Children's Code Article 603.2 and 606(A)(6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 603.2. Pregnancy of a child; service eligibility
A. Upon receipt of a report that a child fourteen years of age or younger is
pregnant, the department shall initiate a safety assessment in accordance with its
child protection procedures.
B. A child who is seventeen years of age or younger who is pregnant shall
be eligible for services provided by the department, including but not limited to
medical coordination, counseling, case management, and protective supervision as
warranted.
C. Nothing in this Article shall require the filing of a petition pursuant to
Article 631 unless independent grounds exist pursuant to Article 606.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1224 ENROLLED
Art. 606. Grounds; child in need of care
A. Allegations that a child is in need of care shall assert one or more of the
following grounds:
* * *
(6) The child is twelve years of age or younger and is pregnant.
* * *
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. A reporter shall immediately report suspected child abuse or neglect or
that child abuse or neglect was a contributing factor in a child's death in the
following ways:
* * *
(3) Dual reporting to both the department and the local or state law
enforcement agency is permitted. However, the agency who receives a report
pursuant to Subparagraph (1) or (2) of this Paragraph shall be the agency responsible
for accepting and acting on the report and shall ensure referral to other agencies as
necessary. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Paragraph, the pregnancy of
a child fourteen years of age or younger shall be reported to the Department of
Children and Family Services.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.